Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.690

Unlawful release of court and law enforcement employee information—Court action to prevent.

(1) Whenever it appears that any person or organization is engaged in or about to engage in any act that constitutes or will constitute a violation of RCW 4.24.680, the prosecuting attorney or any person harmed by an alleged violation of RCW 4.24.680 may initiate a civil proceeding in superior court to enjoin such violation, and may petition the court to issue an order for the discontinuance of the dissemination of information in violation of RCW 4.24.680.

(2) An action under this section shall be brought in the county in which the violation is alleged to have taken place, and shall be commenced by the filing of a verified complaint, or shall be accompanied by an affidavit.

(3) If it is shown to the satisfaction of the court, either by verified complaint or affidavit, that a person or organization is engaged in or about to engage in any act that constitutes a violation of RCW 4.24.680, the court may issue a temporary restraining order to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of the act.

(4) The court may issue a permanent injunction to restrain, abate, or prevent the continuance or recurrence of the violation of RCW 4.24.680. The court may grant declaratory relief, mandatory orders, or any other relief deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of the injunction. The court may retain jurisdiction of the case for the purpose of enforcing its orders.

[ 2002 c 336 s 2.]